Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1032.
do enact as follows:SB1032,13Section 1. 77.51 (9rm) of the statutes is created to read:SB1032,1,6477.51 (9rm) “Over-the-counter drug” means a drug that contains a label that 5identifies the product as a drug as required by 21 CFR 201.66, including a label that 6includes any of the following:SB1032,2,11(a) A drug facts panel.SB1032,2,32(b) A statement of the active ingredients with a list of those ingredients 3contained in the compound, substance, or preparation.SB1032,24Section 2. 77.54 (14) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1032,2,5577.54 (14) (g) Over-the-counter drugs.SB1032,36Section 3. Effective date.SB1032,2,87(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 8publication.SB1032,2,99